Illinois, session 104th, SB3489.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Weather Radar Interference Mitigation Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that wind 7turbines can interfere with the operation of nearby weather 8radar stations, creating hazards for communities during 9weather events. 10    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:11    "Inclement weather alert" means a winter storm advisory, a 12winter storm watch, a winter storm warning, a blizzard 13warning, a severe thunderstorm watch, a severe thunderstorm 14warning, a tornado watch, or a tornado warning. 15    "Weather radar station" means a weather station that is 16operated by the National Weather Service and that uses radar 17to detect precipitation and its intensity and motion. 18    "Wind turbine" means a tower-mounted device that converts 19the kinetic energy from the wind into electrical energy. "Wind 20turbine" includes the tower, nacelle, and blades of a wind 21turbine.22    "Wind turbine operator" means (1) a person or entity with   SB3489- 2 -LRB104 18789 BDA 32232 b1a direct ownership interest in and substantial control of a 2wind turbine or (2) a person or entity that operates or manages 3a wind turbine. 4    Section 15. Operation of wind turbine paused during 5inclement weather alert. 6    (a) If a National Weather Service Forecast Office issues 7an inclement weather alert for an area within the State and if 8a wind turbine operator owns, operates, or manages a wind 9turbine located within 40 miles of the weather radar station 10operated by that National Weather Service Forecast Office, 11then the wind turbine operator shall pause operation of the 12wind turbine during the inclement weather alert.13    (b) Beginning August 1, 2027, no person shall construct a 14wind turbine within 7 miles of a weather radar station 15operated by a National Weather Service Forecast Office or a 16wind turbine with a height that is greater than 60 meters 17within 10 miles of a weather radar station operated by a 18National Weather Service Forecast Office. 19    Section 20. Penalties. A wind turbine owner or operator 20who is suspected of violating Section 15 of this Act shall 21receive a written warning from the State's Attorney of the 22county where the suspected violation occurred. A wind turbine 23owner or operator who knowingly violates Section 15 of this 24Act after receiving any written warning under this Section is   SB3489- 3 -LRB104 18789 BDA 32232 b1guilty of a business offense and subject to a fine in excess of 2$1,000 but not exceeding $5,000. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.